District of Columbia statutes.
46-229

Rules of procedure.

The Court shall establish rules of procedure necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 30, 33 DCR 6710

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-529.